Wisconsin, session 2025, SB353.
do enact as follows:SB353,11Section 1. 16.24 of the statutes is created to read:SB353,2,6216.24 Frozen federal aid; withholding of payments to the federal 3government. If the secretary determines that federal aid to this state that was 4previously authorized under an act of Congress is being withheld under an 5executive order of the president of the United States or in contravention of a court 6order, the secretary shall do all of the following:SB353,2,97(1) Determine the approximate amount of federal aid this state is being or is 8expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the 9court order.SB353,2,1310(2) No later than 60 days after the date of the executive order or court order, 11submit to the governor and to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for 12distribution to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) a report that does all of the 13following:SB353,2,1614(a) Describes in detail the amount of federal aid this state is being or is 15expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the 16court order, as determined under sub. (1).SB353,2,1917(b) Identifies all moneys this state is required to pay to the federal 18government for any reason during the succeeding 12 months after the report is 19submitted.SB353,3,51(3) Of the moneys identified under sub. (2) (b), withhold the payment of those 2moneys to the federal government in a total amount not to exceed the approximate 3amount of federal aid this state is being or is expected to be deprived of as the result 4of the executive order or contravention of the court order, as determined under sub. 5(1).SB353,3,86(4) Authorize the payment to the federal government of the moneys withheld 7under sub. (3) upon the state’s receipt of all federal aid previously withheld under 8the executive order or in contravention of the court order.SB353,3,99